Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3285.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8 of chapter 30B of the general laws is hereby amended, by adding
at the end thereof the following:-
“No emergency procurement contract entered into pursuant to this section where the
commonwealth is a party and the total value of the contract exceeds $100,000 shall endure for a
period of more than 90 days, provided, however that such a contract may be extended for
subsequent periods of no more than 90 days upon written findings of the necessity of such
extension, consistent with the provisions of this section, which shall be entered upon the record,
provided that any such emergency procurement shall be approved in writing by the governor.
The procurement officer shall make a record of each emergency contract as soon after the
procurement as practicable, specifying each contractor's name, the amount and the type of each
contract, a listing of the supply or service provided under each contract, and the basis for
determining the need for an emergency procurement, provided that such record shall include
of 2

written findings specifying the cause and circumstances of the emergency, the reasons why it
was not reasonably foreseeable, and any identifiable risks arising from not utilizing an
emergency contract. The procurement officer shall submit a copy of this record at the earliest
possible time to the state secretary for placement in any publication established by the state
secretary for the advertisement of procurements, posting on the secretary of states website in an
area that is exclusive for posting of procurements and shall also submit a copy of such record to
the inspector general, for review provided further, that the inspector general shall file a report
containing the results of such review in a timely manner with the clerks of the house and senate.
SECTION 2. 30B as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is hereby amended by
inserting after section 1 the new section 1 1/2:-This chapter shall apply to every contract
conducted by a non profit entity as established under chapter 180 of the general laws pursuant to
a contract or other grant of funding from the commonwealth
SECTION 3. Section 20 of Chapter 268A as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- Provisions of this chapter shall
apply to any board member, officer, director or employee of any non-profit as established under
chapter 180 entity seeking or receiving a contract involving state funding.
of 2